Minnesota, session 2025-2026, SF2720.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF MINNESOTA: Section 1. Minnesota Statutes 2024, section 97A.451, subdivision 3, is amended to read: Subd. 3. Residents and nonresidents under age 16; small game. (a) A resident or nonresident under age 16 may not obtain a small-game license but may take small game by firearms or bow and arrow without a license if the resident or nonresident is: (1) age 14 or 15 and possesses a firearms safety certificate; (2) age 13, possesses a firearms safety certificate, and is accompanied by a parent or guardian; (3) age 13, 14, or 15, and possesses an apprentice-hunter validation as provided under section 97B.022; or (4) age 12 or under and is accompanied by a parent or guardian. (b) A resident under age 16 may take small gamedeleted text begin , other than wolves,deleted text end by trapping without a small-game license, but a resident 13 years of age or older must have a trapping license. A resident under age 13 may trap small gamedeleted text begin , other than wolves,deleted text end without a trapping license, but may not register fisher, otter, bobcat, or pine marten unless the resident is at least age five. Any fisher, otter, bobcat, or pine marten taken by a resident under age five must be included in the limit of the accompanying parent or guardian. (c) A resident or nonresident under age 13 must obtain a free turkey license to take turkey and may take a turkey without a firearms safety certificate if the resident or nonresident is accompanied by an adult parent or guardian who has a firearms safety certificate. (d) A resident under age 13 may apply for a prairie-chicken license and may take a prairie chicken without a firearms safety certificate if the resident is accompanied by an adult parent or guardian who has a firearms safety certificate. Sec. 2. Minnesota Statutes 2024, section 97B.645, subdivision 9, is amended to read: Subd. 9. Open season. deleted text begin There shall be nodeleted text end new text begin (a) The commissioner must prescribe an annualnew text end open season for wolves deleted text begin until afterdeleted text end new text begin under section 97B.647 unlessnew text end the wolf is deleted text begin delisteddeleted text end new text begin listednew text end under the federal Endangered Species Act of 1973. deleted text begin After that time, the commissioner may prescribe open seasons and restrictions for taking wolves but must provide opportunity for public comment.deleted text end new text begin (b) The commissioner must annually consult with the commissioner of agriculture and the United States Department of Agriculture, Animal and Plant Health Inspection Service, before determining the season, restrictions, and other requirements of the open season required under this subdivision. The consultation must include a review of available data on wolf depredation on livestock and pets and other incidents of human conflict and must have a goal of maintaining a population of wolves in this state of between 1,251 and 1,400, except as modified by the United States Fish and Wildlife Service. new text end Sec. 3. Minnesota Statutes 2024, section 97B.646, is amended to read: 97B.646 WOLF MANAGEMENT. (a) The commissioner, in consultation with the commissioner of agriculture, shall adopt a wolf management plan that includes goals to ensure the long-term survival of the wolf in Minnesota, to reduce conflicts between wolves and humans, to minimize depredation of livestock and domestic pets, and to manage the ecological impact of wolves on prey species and other predators.new text begin Once the management plan is adopted, the commissioner may amend, rescind, or adopt a new plan only when expressly directed to do so by the legislature.new text end (b) The commissioner shall compile a list that is updated quarterly on known wolf deaths, based on reporting by conservation officers. The list must specify the date and location of each wolf death and must be available on the department website. new text begin EFFECTIVE DATE. new text end new text begin This section is effective the day following final enactment. new text end Sec. 4. Minnesota Statutes 2024, section 97B.647, subdivision 2, is amended to read: Subd. 2. Open seasons. Wolves may be taken with legal firearms, with bow and arrow, and by trapping. The open season to take wolves deleted text begin with firearms begins each year on the same day as the opening of the firearms deer-hunting season. The commissioner may by rule prescribe the open seasons for wolves according to this subdivisiondeleted text end new text begin is between November 1 and January 31new text end .